Utah statutes.
10-5-111.   Basis for property tax levy.

From the effective date of the budget or of any amendment enacted prior to the date on which property taxes are levied, the amount stated therein as the amount of estimated revenue from property taxes shall constitute the basis for determining the property tax levy to be set by the council for the corresponding tax year, subject to the applicable limitations imposed by law.

